testdata/Automatically_trimming_a_monodix/test-en.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="beer__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="beer"><i>beer</i><par n="beer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="school"><i>school</i><par n="beer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="computer"><i>computer</i><par n="beer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="house"><i>house</i><par n="beer__n"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
